apertium-hye-eng.hye.dix
    <pardef n="Մարիամ__np">
      <e><p>          <l>ից</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ի</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ին</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ով</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ը</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Սարգ/իս__np">
      <e><p>          <l>սից</l><r>իս<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>սի</l><r>իս<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իս</l><r>իս<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>սին</l><r>իս<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>սով</l><r>իս<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իսը</l><r>իս<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իսն</l><r>իս<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Խորխոռուն/ի__np">
      <e><p>          <l>ուց</l><r>ի<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ու</l><r>ի<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ի</l><r>ի<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուն</l><r>ի<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ով</l><r>ի<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ին</l><r>ի<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Բաղրամյան__np">
      <e><p>          <l>ից</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ի</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ին</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ով</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ը</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ուրարտու__np">
      <e><p>          <l>ից</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ի</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ին</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ում</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ով</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Երևան__np">
      <e><p>          <l>ից</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ի</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ին</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ը</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ում</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ով</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Գայանե__np">
      <e><p>          <l>ից</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ի</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ին</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ով</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Վեդա__np">
      <e><p>          <l>յից</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>յի</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>յին</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ը</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>յում</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>յով</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Կարպատներ__np">
      <e><p>          <l>ից</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ի</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ին</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ն</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ը</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ում</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ով</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Յարոսլավլ"><i>Յարոսլավլ</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Կույումջյան"><i>Կույումջյան</i><par n="Բաղրամյան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Արխանգելսկ"><i>Արխանգելսկ</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Խորխոռունի"><i>Խորխոռուն</i><par n="Խորխոռուն/ի__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Նաբերեժնիե Չելնի"><i>Նաբերեժնիե<b/>Չելնի</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Բաղրամյան"><i>Բաղրամյան</i><par n="Բաղրամյան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Սիմֆերոպոլ"><i>Սիմֆերոպոլ</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Հուանհե"><i>Հուանհե</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Գամիրք"><i>Գամիրք</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ալմաթի"><i>Ալմաթի</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Սոչի"><i>Սոչի</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ուլան-Ուդե"><i>Ուլան-Ուդե</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Սևաստոպոլ"><i>Սևաստոպոլ</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Եղիսաբեթ"><i>Եղիսաբեթ</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Վարաժնունի"><i>Վարաժնուն</i><par n="Խորխոռուն/ի__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Երևան"><i>Երևան</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Վեդա"><i>Վեդա</i><par n="Վեդա__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Կարին"><i>Կարին</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Զիմբաբվե"><i>Զիմբաբվե</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ուրարտու"><i>Ուրարտու</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Շուշան"><i>Շուշան</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Վինի-Թուխ"><i>Վինի-Թուխ</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Արշակունի"><i>Արշակուն</i><par n="Խորխոռուն/ի__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Դուշանբե"><i>Դուշանբե</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Նովոռոսիյսկ"><i>Նովոռոսիյսկ</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Անահիտ"><i>Անահիտ</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ֆիջի"><i>Ֆիջի</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Կյուսյու"><i>Կյուսյու</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Խաբարովսկ"><i>Խաբարովսկ</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Մանդակունի"><i>Մանդակուն</i><par n="Խորխոռուն/ի__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Կարպատներ"><i>Կարպատներ</i><par n="Կարպատներ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Բեդոկ"><i>Բեդոկ</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Արծրունի"><i>Արծրուն</i><par n="Խորխոռուն/ի__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Մագելան"><i>Մագելան</i><par n="Բաղրամյան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ֆրիուլի"><i>Ֆրիուլի</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Հելսինկի"><i>Հելսինկի</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Կրետե"><i>Կրետե</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Բիհար"><i>Բիհար</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ուրումչի"><i>Ուրումչի</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Այծեմնիկ"><i>Այծեմնիկ</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Սարգիս"><i>Սարգ</i><par n="Սարգ/իս__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Տայք"><i>Տայք</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Գաֆէսճեան"><i>Գաֆէսճեան</i><par n="Բաղրամյան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Մանե"><i>Մանե</i><par n="Գայանե__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Մոխրոտ"><i>Մոխրոտ</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Մարիամ"><i>Մարիամ</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Նունե"><i>Նունե</i><par n="Գայանե__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Քյոլն"><i>Քյոլն</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Սաթենիկ"><i>Սաթենիկ</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Մեդվեդեւ"><i>Մեդվեդեւ</i><par n="Բաղրամյան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Վիլնյուս"><i>Վիլնյուս</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Շաքար"><i>Շաքար</i><par n="Գայանե__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Գայանե"><i>Գայանե</i><par n="Գայանե__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Արունաչալ Պրադեշ"><i>Արունաչալ Պրադեշ</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Կոյամպուտուր"><i>Կոյամպուտուր</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Համեստ"><i>Համեստ</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Լուսինե"><i>Լուսինե</i><par n="Գայանե__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Բագրատունի"><i>Բագրատուն</i><par n="Խորխոռուն/ի__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ապենիններ"><i>Ապենիններ</i><par n="Կարպատներ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Խրուշչով"><i>Խրուշչով</i><par n="Բաղրամյան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Վաշինգտոն"><i>Վաշինգտոն</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Տոլյատի"><i>Տոլյատի</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Աստղիկ"><i>Աստղիկ</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Պուտտուչչերի"><i>Պուտտուչչերի</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Յակուտսկ"><i>Յակուտսկ</i><par n="Երևան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Սիկոկու"><i>Սիկոկու</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ձվիկ"><i>Ձվիկ</i><par n="Մարիամ__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Պուտին"><i>Պուտին</i><par n="Բաղրամյան__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Յու Թի"><i>Յու<b/>Թի</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Զապորոժիե"><i>Զապորոժիե</i><par n="Ուրարտու__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Հեղինե"><i>Հեղինե</i><par n="Գայանե__np"/></e>
